District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

34-1230

Operational requirements.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 31, 29 DCR 2872
Oct. 22, 1983, D.C. Law 5-36, § 2(ee), 30 DCR 4289
Mar. 21, 1987, D.C. Law 6-216, § 13(h), 34 DCR 1072
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-210, § 2(y), 43 DCR 4702
Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 3, 49 DCR 7334

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 43-1830.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 3 of Cable Television Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-409, July 15, 2002, 49 DCR 7280).